North Dakota, session 69, SB2292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 12.1-34-07 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. Upon submission of appropriate documentation, the attorney general, within the limits of
legislative appropriations, shall reimburse from the general fund the health care facility or a
health care professional for the reasonable costs incurred in performing the medical screening
and acute forensic medical examination. The attorney general, subject to legislative
appropriations, shall reimburse from the general fund each accredited children's advocacy
center located in the state for a forensic interview that is not reimbursable by Medicaid or
crime victims compensation.

S. B. NO. 2292 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2292.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 89 Nays 0 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State